Utah statutes.
41-1a-1201.   Disposition of fees.
(1)  All fees received and collected under this part shall be transmitted
daily to the state treasurer.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsections (3), (5), and (6) and Sections
41-1a-422, 41-1a-1220, 41-1a-1221, and 41-1a-1223 all fees collected under
this part shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.
(3) (a)  Funds generated under Subsections 41-1a-1211(1)(b)(i), (6)(b)(i), and
(7) and Section 41-1a-1212 may be used by the commission as a dedicated credit
to cover the costs incurred in issuing license plates under Part 4, License
Plates and Registration Indicia.
(b)  Fees for statehood centennial license plates shall be collected and
deposited in the Transportation Fund, less production and administrative costs
incurred by the commission.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3) and Section 41-1a-1205, the expenses
of the commission in enforcing and administering this part shall be provided
for by legislative appropriation from the revenues of the Transportation Fund.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), the following portions of
the registration fees imposed under Section 41-1a-1206 for each vehicle shall
be deposited in the Centennial Highway Fund Restricted Account created under
Section 72-2-118:
(i)  $10 of the registration fees imposed under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(a),
(1)(b), (2), and (5);
(ii)  $1 of the registration fees imposed under Subsections
41-1a-1206(1)(c)(i), (1)(c)(ii), and (1)(d)(ii);
(iii)  $2 of the registration fee imposed under Subsection
41-1a-1206(1)(e)(ii);
(iv)  $3 of the registration fee imposed under Subsection 41-1a-1206(1)(d)(i);
and
(v)  $4.50 of the registration fee imposed under Subsection
41-1a-1206(1)(e)(i).
(b)  When the highway general obligation bonds have been paid off and the
highway projects completed that are intended to be paid from revenues
deposited in the Centennial Highway Fund Restricted Account as determined by
the Executive Appropriations Committee under Subsection 72-2-118(6)(d), the
portions of the registration fees deposited under Subsection (5)(a) for each
vehicle shall be deposited in the Transportation Investment Fund of 2005
created by Section 72-2-124.
(6)  The following portions of the registration fees imposed under Section
41-1a-1206 for each vehicle shall be deposited in the Transportation
Investment Fund of 2005 created by Section 72-2-124:
(a) $20 of each registration fee collected under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(a),
(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d)(i), (1)(e)(i), (2)(a), and (5); and
(b)  50 cents of each registration fee collected under Subsection
41-1a-1206(1)(e)(ii).
